New Jersey, session 222, A1286.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Political Donation Transparency Act. 2.    a.  No candidate, political committee, continuing political committee, candidate committee, joint candidates committee, legislative leadership committee, independent expenditure committee, or political party committee, or any person or entity acting on behalf of such candidate or committee, shall employ the use of automatic or recurring contributions when soliciting contributions within the meaning of P.L.1973, c.83 (C.19:44A-1 et seq.), unless the following standards are met: (1)  a contribution shall not be made automatic or recurring by default; (2)  a contribution shall only be made automatic or recurring upon the affirmative consent of the person making the contribution; and (3)  a clear and conspicuous description of the nature, frequency, and amount of the automatic or recurring contribution shall be provided alongside the option to make a contribution automatic or recurring. b.    The Election Law Enforcement Commission may promulgate, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. c.    Any person found to have violated the provisions of this section or the rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.